Nebraska, session 109, LB440.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB440 LB440
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Education Leave and Support Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Education Leave and Support Act:
(1) Covered employee means a certificated teacher employed by a
school district;
(2) Department means the State Department of Education;
(3) Employer means a school district;
(4) FMLA leave means leave taken by a covered employee under the
federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.; and
(5) School district has the same meaning as in section 79-101.
Sec. 3. Beginning January 1, 2026, a payroll fee of thirty-five
hundredths of one percent shall be levied on the taxable wages of covered
employees in the state. Employers shall collect the fee from covered
employees and remit it quarterly to the State Treasurer. Employers shall
also contribute an amount equal to the total payroll fee collected from
their covered employees as an employer match and remit this contribution
quarterly to the State Treasurer. All fees and contributions collected
under this section shall be credited to the State Education Leave Fund.
Sec. 4. (1) The State Education Leave Fund is hereby created. The
fund shall be administered by the department. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The fund shall be used solely to reimburse school districts for
the cost of hiring substitute teachers for the first six weeks of a
covered employee's FMLA leave.
(3) Reimbursements under this section shall begin July 1, 2026. The
department shall develop and implement procedures to:
(a) Accept applications for reimbursement from school districts;
(b) Review applications in order to ensure compliance with
eligibility requirements; and
-2-

LB440 LB440
2025 2025
(c) Disburse funds in a timely manner.
(4) Reimbursements under this section shall be made from the fund in
an amount not to exceed the actual daily cost of hiring a substitute
teacher, as determined by the department.
(5) Any covered employee for whom reimbursement is provided under
this section shall not be required to use any accrued personal or sick
leave for the first six weeks of FMLA leave.
(6) The department shall submit an annual report to the Legislature
detailing the fund's expenditures, utilization rates, and remaining
balance.
Sec. 5. (1) The Education Retention Fund is hereby created. The
fund shall be administered by the department. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) If the State Education Leave Fund accrues a surplus exceeding
twenty percent of its projected annual needs, the department shall notify
the State Treasurer, and the State Treasurer shall transfer the excess
funds to the Education Retention Fund. Funds transferred under this
section shall be used to address teacher shortages and support
professional development.
Sec. 6. (1) Any school district that misuses funds received from
the State Education Leave Fund shall repay the funds in full and shall be
subject to penalties as prescribed by the department.
(2) The State Education Leave Fund shall be subject to an annual
audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
-3-